Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/et_affix.dat
SFX A   ma                   is                   [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   ma                   sime                 [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   ma                   site                 [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   ma                   vat                  [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   ma                   ev                   [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   ma                   a                    [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   ma                   es                   [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   ma                   nud                  [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   ma                   ku                   [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   ma                   kem                  [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   ma                   ke                   [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   ma                   nuksin               [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   ma                   nuksid               [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   ma                   nuks                 [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   ma                   nuksime              [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   ma                   nuksite              [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   edma                 an                   needma
SFX A   edma                 ad                   needma
SFX A   edma                 ab                   needma
SFX A   edma                 ame                  needma
SFX A   edma                 ate                  needma
SFX A   edma                 avad                 needma
SFX A   edma                 aksin                needma
SFX A   edma                 aksid                needma
SFX A   edma                 aks                  needma
SFX A   edma                 aksime               needma
SFX A   edma                 aksite               needma
SFX A   edma                 a                    needma
SFX A   adma                 an                   [st]eadma
SFX A   adma                 ad                   [st]eadma
SFX A   adma                 ab                   [st]eadma
SFX A   adma                 ame                  [st]eadma
SFX A   adma                 ate                  [st]eadma
SFX A   adma                 avad                 [st]eadma
SFX A   adma                 aksin                [st]eadma
SFX A   adma                 aksid                [st]eadma
SFX A   adma                 aks                  [st]eadma
SFX A   adma                 aksime               [st]eadma
SFX A   adma                 aksite               [st]eadma
SFX A   adma                 a                    [st]eadma
SFX A   dma                  tud                  [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   dma                  takse                [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   dma                  ta                   [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   dma                  ti                   [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   dma                  taks                 [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   dma                  tagu                 [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   dma                  tavat                [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   dma                  tama                 [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   dma                  tav                  [nst]e[ae]dma
SFX A   0                    s                    [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   0                    st                   [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   0                    ks                   [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   0                    ta                   [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   sin                  [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   sid                  [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   is                   [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   sime                 [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   site                 [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   vat                  [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   ev                   [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   da                   [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   des                  [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   nud                  [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   gu                   [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   gem                  [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   ge                   [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   nuksin               [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   nuksid               [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   nuks                 [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   nuksime              [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   nuksite              [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   dud                  [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   dakse                [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   di                   [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   daks                 [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   dagu                 [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   davat                [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   dama                 [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   ma                   dav                  [klmnsv][aeiö][eiuö][lnr]ma
SFX A   0                    s                    k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   0                    st                   k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   0                    ks                   k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   0                    ta                   k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   sin                  k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   sid                  k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   is                   k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   sime                 k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   site                 k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   vat                  k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   ev                   k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   da                   k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   des                  k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   nud                  k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   gu                   k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   gem                  k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   ge                   k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   nuksin               k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   nuksid               k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   nuks                 k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   nuksime              k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   nuksite              k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   en                   k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   ed                   k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   eb                   k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   eme                  k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   ete                  k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   evad                 k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   eksin                k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   eksid                k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   eks                  k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   eksime               k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   eksite               k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   e                    k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   dud                  k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   dakse                k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   di                   k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   daks                 k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   dagu                 k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   davat                k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   dama                 k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   ma                   dav                  k[ou][ou]lma
SFX A   0                    s                    [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   0                    st                   [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   0                    ks                   [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   0                    ta                   [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   in                   [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   id                   [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   is                   [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   ime                  [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   ite                  [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   vat                  [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   ev                   [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   ta                   [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   tes                  [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   nud                  [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   ku                   [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   kem                  [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   ke                   [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   nuksin               [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   nuksid               [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   nuks                 [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   nuksime              [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   nuksite              [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   an                   [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   ad                   [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   ab                   [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   ame                  [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   ate                  [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   avad                 [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   aksin                [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   aksid                [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   aks                  [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   aksime               [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   aksite               [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   a                    [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   tud                  [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   takse                [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   ti                   [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   taks                 [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   tagu                 [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   tavat                [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   tama                 [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   ma                   tav                  [lmps][aeü][ikp]sma
SFX A   0                    s                    [nptõ][aiõä][atuä]sma
SFX A   0                    st                   [nptõ][aiõä][atuä]sma
SFX A   0                    ks                   [nptõ][aiõä][atuä]sma
SFX A   0                    ta                   [nptõ][aiõä][atuä]sma
SFX A   ma                   in                   [nptõ][aiõä][atuä]sma
SFX A   ma                   id                   [nptõ][aiõä][atuä]sma
SFX A   ma                   is                   [nptõ][aiõä][atuä]sma
SFX A   ma                   ime                  [nptõ][aiõä][atuä]sma
SFX A   ma                   ite                  [nptõ][aiõä][atuä]sma
SFX A   ma                   vat                  [nptõ][aiõä][atuä]sma
SFX A   ma                   ev                   [nptõ][aiõä][atuä]sma
SFX A   ma                   ta                   [nptõ][aiõä][atuä]sma
SFX A   ma                   tes                  [nptõ][aiõä][atuä]sma
SFX A   ma                   nud                  [nptõ][aiõä][atuä]sma
